Maryland, session 2025, SB0198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
2–103.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “CAPACITY ENHANCING PROJECT” MEANS ANY PROJECT THAT
MODIFIES THE TRANSPORTATION SYSTEM TO IMPROVE THE ABILITY OF THE
TRANSPORTATION SYSTEM TO MOVE PEOPLE AND GOODS.
(3) “Capital project” means:
(i) Any project for which funds are expended for construction,
reconstruction, or rehabilitation of a transportation facility by the Department or of a
transportation facilities project by the Maryland Transportation Authority; or
(ii) Capital equipment, as defined by the Secretary.
[(3)] (4) “Construction phase” means the phase of a capital project in
which the project is committed and advanced from the project development phase to
completion.
[(4)] (5) “Major capital project” means any new, expanded, or
significantly improved facility or service that involves planning, environmental studies,
design, right–of–way, construction, or purchase of essential equipment related to the
facility or service.
[(5)] (6) “Major SURFACE transportation project” has the meaning stated
in § 2–103.7 of this subtitle.
[(6)] (7) “Minor capital project” means any project for the preservation or
rehabilitation of an existing facility or service, including the planning, design,

SENATE BILL 198 3
right–of–way, construction, or purchase of equipment essential to the facility or service,
and generally not requiring the preparation of an environmental impact assessment.
[(7)] (8) “Project development phase” means the phase of a capital project
in which planning, engineering, and environmental studies and analyses are conducted
with full participation by the public, prior to commitment to construction.
[(8)] (9) (i) “Proposing entity” means a government agency or political
subdivision that requests that a transportation project be included in the Consolidated
Transportation Program.
(ii) “Proposing entity” includes a county, a municipality, a
metropolitan planning organization, A TRANSIT AGENCY, and a modal administration or
any other agency of the Department.
[(9)] (10) “Purpose and need summary statement” means a brief statement
that specifies the underlying purpose and need for a project.
[(10)] (11) “Significant change” means any change that affects the size or
character of a project to the extent that the change:
(i) Substantially modifies the capacity[,] OR level of service[, or
cost] of the project;
(ii) AFFECTS THE DEPARTMENT’S ABILITY TO DELIVER THE
PROJECT ON TIME AND ON BUDGET;
(III) Alters the function, SCOPE, or purpose of the project; or
[(iii)] (IV) Impacts the ability of a modal administration to
accomplish the program priorities established by the Secretary in the State Report on
Transportation.
(12) “STATE OF GOOD REPAIR” MEANS A PROJECT ELIGIBLE UNDER
THE TRANSIT STATE OF GOOD REPAIR PROGRAM IN § 7–309 OF THIS ARTICLE OR
UNDER THE HIGHWAY STATE OF GOOD REPAIR PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER §
8–1103 OF THIS ARTICLE.
[(11)] (13) “State transportation goals” means the goals described in §
2–103.7 of this subtitle.
(14) “TRANSIT AGENCY” MEANS THE MARYLAND TRANSIT
ADMINISTRATION, THE WASHINGTON METROPOLITAN AREA TRANSIT AUTHORITY,
OR AN AGENCY THAT OPERATES A LOCALLY OPERATED TRANSIT SYSTEM.

SENATE BILL 198
[(12)] (15) “Transportation facilities project” has the meaning stated in §
4–101(i) of this article.
[(13)] (16) “Transportation facility” has the meaning stated in § 3–101(l) of
this article.
(b) The State Report on Transportation consists of the Consolidated
Transportation Program and the Maryland Transportation Plan.
(c) (1) The Consolidated Transportation Program shall:
(i) Be revised annually; and
(ii) Include:
1. A list of:
A. The State transportation goals;
B. Program priorities;
C. For projects in the construction phase, the criteria used to
select DIFFERENT TYPES OF major capital projects for inclusion in the capital program;
and
D. The [manner in which each major transportation project
was evaluated and ranked] RESULTS OF THE EVALUATION OF MAJOR SURFACE
TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS SELECTED FOR FUNDING under § 2–103.7 of this
subtitle;
2. A statement of the Department’s projected annual
operating costs, set forth separately for the Office of the Secretary and for each modal
administration;
3. Expanded descriptions of major capital projects THAT
INCLUDE:
A. THE NAME OF THE PROJECT;
B. THE SCOPE OF WORK AND SCHEDULE ANTICIPATED
FOR THE PROJECT;
C. A PURPOSE AND NEED SUMMARY STATEMENT;
D. A DELINEATION OF THE STATE OF GOOD REPAIR
PORTION OF THE PROJECT FROM ANY CAPACITY ENHANCING ELEMENTS;

SENATE BILL 198 5
E. THE TRANSPORTATION NEED IDENTIFIED IN THE
MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION PLAN;
F. THE LOCATION OF THE PROJECT, INCLUDING A MAP
OF THE PROJECT LIMITS, PROJECT AREA, OR TRANSPORTATION CORRIDOR;
G. THE ESTIMATED COST BY PHASE OF THE PROJECT;
H. THE AMOUNT OF FUNDING ALLOCATED TO THE
PROJECT BY PHASE AND BY FUNDING SOURCE, INCLUDING FEDERAL, SPECIAL, OR
OTHER FUNDING; AND
I. ANY MAJOR MODIFICATIONS TO THE DESCRIPTIONS
REQUIRED UNDER ITEM B, C, OR G OF THIS ITEM;
4. A list of major capital projects for the current year, the
budget request year, and the 4 successive planning years;
5. A list of [anticipated] ALL IDENTIFIED minor capital
projects[, including a specific list of anticipated special projects] for the current year and
the budget request year and an estimate of the Program level for each of the 4 successive
planning years;
6. A list of major bridge work projects;
7. A summary of the capital and operating programs, as
defined by the Secretary, for the Maryland Transportation Authority;
8. [For each listed major capital project, an indication
whether the revenue source anticipated to support that project consists of federal, special,
general, or other funds;
9.] The Department’s estimates of the levels and sources of
revenues to be used to fund the projects in the Program, INCLUDING AVAILABLE TOLL
CREDITS;
[10.] 9. A glossary of terms; and
[11.] 10. A cross–reference table for the information
contained in the various parts of the State Report on Transportation.
(2) In addition to the items listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
Consolidated Transportation Program shall include:

SENATE BILL 198
(i) A summary of current efforts and future plans, prepared after
consultation with the Director of Bicycle and Pedestrian Access and the Bicycle and
Pedestrian Advisory Committee established under § 2–606 of this title:
1. To develop and promote bicycle and pedestrian
transportation; and
2. Working together with local jurisdictions, to accommodate
in a safe and effective manner pedestrians and bicycles within a reasonable distance for
walking and bicycling to rail stops, light rail stops, and subway stations;
(ii) A listing of all bicycle and pedestrian transportation projects
expected to use State or federal highway funds; and
(iii) Reflected under the Office of the Secretary, any
technology–related project to be funded from the account established under § 2–111 of this
subtitle, along with a description and projected cost of each.
(3) In addition to the items listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
Consolidated Transportation Program shall include a summary of current efforts and
future plans to increase commuter access between the campuses of the University of
Maryland, including:
(i) Easing traffic congestion; and
(ii) Use of mass transit.
(4) Annually, the Consolidated Transportation Program shall include a
report that:
(i) Identifies each major capital project for which the budget bill or
a supplemental budget amendment first requests funds for the project development phase
or for the construction phase;
(ii) With respect to each major capital project for which funds are
requested in the budget request year, states:
1. The amount of the funds requested; and
2. The total estimated cost of the project;
(iii) Identifies significant changes in the cost, scope, design, or
scheduling of major capital projects for each completed fiscal year;
(iv) When there is a significant change in cost, states the amount by
which the expenditures that have been authorized exceed the original project estimate;

SENATE BILL 198 7
(v) When there is a significant change, states:
1. The amount by which costs exceed projected costs during
each completed fiscal year; and
2. The total amount that has been expended for a major
capital project;
(vi) Provides a purpose and need summary statement that includes:
1. A general description and summary that describes why
the project is necessary and satisfies State transportation goals, including Climate Action
Plan goals required [by the Greenhouse Gas Emissions Reduction Act of 2009] under §
2–1205(b) of the Environment Article;
2. The location of the project, including a map of the project
limits, project area, or transportation corridor; and
3. A summary of how the project meets the selection criteria
for inclusion in the capital program;
(vii) Provides the Maryland Transit Administration state of good
repair budget for the current fiscal year and projections for the subsequent fiscal year; and
(viii) Includes any other information that the Secretary believes would
be useful to the members of the General Assembly, the general public, or other recipients
of the Consolidated Transportation Program.
(5) The total operating and capital expenditures for the Department or for
the Office of the Secretary or any modal administration projected in the Consolidated
Transportation Program for the budget request year may not exceed the budget request for
the Department, Office, or modal administration for that year.
[(6) For a major capital project to be considered for inclusion in the
construction program of the Consolidated Transportation Program, a request must be
submitted to the Secretary by the proposing entity along with a purpose and need summary
statement justifying the project that includes:
(i) The location of the project, including a map of the project limits,
project area, or transportation corridor;
(ii) The need for the project;
(iii) A discussion of how the project:
1. Addresses State transportation goals; and

SENATE BILL 198
2. Supports local government land use plans and goals; and
(iv) A certification that all members of the legislative delegation of
the county in which the project is located have been notified.
(7) (i) The Department shall evaluate requests for major capital
projects based on the State’s transportation goals and, if applicable, using the measures
established under § 2–103.7 of this subtitle, and, as appropriate, criteria as determined by
the information submitted by the proposing entity and the availability of funding.
(ii) As part of the evaluation under this paragraph, the Department
shall acknowledge the difference between urban and rural transportation needs.]
(6) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER REQUESTS FOR
PROJECTS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT AND EVALUATION PROGRAM, STATE OF GOOD
REPAIR PROGRAMS, AND THE PRIORITIZATION PROGRAM.
(II) AS PART OF ITS CONSIDERATION OF PROJECTS REQUESTED
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
1. ESTABLISH AND PUBLISH CLEAR GUIDELINES FOR A
PROPOSING ENTITY TO MAKE A REQUEST FOR EACH PROGRAM, INCLUDING THE
FORM OF PRIORITY LETTERS AND PROCESSES AND CRITERIA THAT THE
DEPARTMENT WILL USE TO EVALUATE EACH REQUEST;
2. ESTABLISH A WEB–BASED SYSTEM FOR SUBMISSION
OF PROJECTS TO BE CONSIDERED FOR INCLUSION IN THE CONSOLIDATED
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM; AND
3. PROVIDE RESPONSES TO EACH REQUEST RECEIVED
FOR THE PRIORITIZATION PROGRAM UNDER § 2–103.7 OF THIS SUBTITLE PRIOR TO
SEPTEMBER 15 EVERY OTHER YEAR, INCLUDING INFORMATION PERTAINING TO THE
DEPARTMENT’S EVALUATION OF THE REQUESTED PROJECT.
[(8)] (7) (i) The Department, in developing a construction or
improvement project involving a bridge or other transportation facility that is adjacent to
or crosses a waterway for inclusion in the Consolidated Transportation Program, shall
consider any reasonable and appropriate measures to provide or improve in the vicinity of
the bridge or other transportation facility water access for fishing, canoeing, kayaking, or
any other nonmotorized water dependent recreational activity.
(ii) The Department, in consultation with the Department of
Natural Resources and interested stakeholders, shall establish:
1. Standards and guidelines for identifying appropriate

SENATE BILL 198 9
bridges and other transportation facilities to be considered for the provision or
improvement of water access under this paragraph; and
2. Best practices and cost effective strategies for
accommodating water access under this paragraph.
[(9)] (8) Except as authorized by law, the Consolidated Transportation
Program may not include capital transportation grants for roads and highways to counties
or municipal corporations for any period beyond the budget request year.
[(10)] (9) (i) In addition to the items listed in paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Consolidated Transportation Program shall include:
1. A table that identifies each project receiving construction
funds:
A. For the first time in the budget request year; and
B. For the first time in the current year if the construction
funds were not identified in the budget year in the Consolidated Transportation Program
released the previous January; and
2. A table that identifies each project receiving planning
funds:
A. For the first time in the budget request year; and
B. For the first time in the current year if the planning funds
were not shown in the budget request year in the Consolidated Transportation Program
released the previous January.
(ii) For each project included in a table required under subparagraph
(i) of this paragraph, the table shall identify:
1. Where the project is listed in the Consolidated
Transportation Program; and
2. By fund, the amount included in the current year budget
and the budget request year budget for the project.
(c–1) If a new approved pedestrian or bicycle safety construction or improvement
project is projected to take more than 12 months to complete, the Department shall
implement all possible incremental, near–term safety improvements as soon as practicable
while maintaining each project’s priority ranking.
(d) (1) The Maryland Transportation Plan shall:

SENATE BILL 198
(i) Except as otherwise provided, be revised every 5 years through
an inclusive public participation process;
(ii) Include [a]:
1. A 10– AND 20–year forecast of State transportation needs,
based on the financial resources anticipated to be available to the Department during [that
20–year period] THE RESPECTIVE 10– AND 20–YEAR PERIODS; AND
2. STATE OF GOOD REPAIR AND CAPACITY EXPANSION
NEEDS;
(iii) Be expressed in terms of the State transportation goals and
measures; and
(iv) Include a summary of the types of projects and programs that are
proposed to accomplish the State transportation goals [and measures,] using a
multi–modal approach [when feasible].
(2) Beginning with the 2045 Maryland Transportation Plan, the
Department shall consider ways to achieve equity in the transportation sector when
developing the State transportation goals.
(3) SUBJECT TO THE REPORTING REQUIREMENTS IN SUBSECTION (G)
OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH PERFORMANCE MEASURES
FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION PLAN AS PART
OF ITS DEVELOPMENT.
(e) On or before November 15 of each year, the Department shall visit each county
to give local governments and local legislative delegations information about and an
opportunity to comment on the [proposed Consolidated Transportation Program and the
proposed Maryland Transportation Plan] FOLLOWING:
(1) THE PROPOSED CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM;
(2) TRANSPORTATION PERFORMANCE AND THE MARYLAND
TRANSPORTATION PLAN IN PLAN DEVELOPMENT YEARS;
(3) IN EVEN–NUMBERED FISCAL YEARS, THE RESULTS OF THE
PROJECT–BASED SCORING SYSTEM DESCRIBED IN § 2–103.7 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(4) IN ODD–NUMBERED FISCAL YEARS:
(I) METHODOLOGY AND PROGRAM COMMENTS RELATED TO
THE PROJECT–BASED SCORING SYSTEM; AND

SENATE BILL 198 11
(II) LOCAL PRIORITIES FOR TRANSPORTATION STATE OF GOOD
REPAIR, ASSET MANAGEMENT, AND DEVELOPMENT AND EVALUATION INITIATIVES.
(f) At the earliest practical date but no later than November 1 of each year, the
Department shall provide the proposed Consolidated Transportation Program and the
proposed Maryland Transportation Plan to the Department of Planning for review and
comment on planning issues including consistency between transportation investments
and the State Economic Growth, Resource Protection, and Planning Policy and State
priority funding areas established under Title 5, Subtitle 7B of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
(g) Beginning with the year 2002 State Report on Transportation and continuing
thereafter, before the General Assembly considers the proposed Maryland Transportation
Plan and the proposed Consolidated Transportation Program, the Department shall submit
an annual report on the attainment of State transportation goals and benchmarks for the
approved and proposed Maryland Transportation Plan and the approved and proposed
Consolidated Transportation Program to the Governor and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, to the General Assembly.
(h) (1) The report required under subsection (g) of this section shall include:
(i) The establishment of certain measurable performance indicators
[or], benchmarks, [in priority funding areas at a minimum,] AND TARGETS designed to
quantify the State transportation goals and measures specified in the Maryland
Transportation Plan [and § 2–103.7 of this subtitle]; and
(ii) The degree to which the projects and programs contained in the
approved Maryland Transportation Plan and Consolidated Transportation Program attain
those goals and benchmarks as measured by the [performance indicators or benchmarks]
PROGRESS TOWARD THE PERFORMANCE TARGETS ESTABLISHED IN ITEM (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.
(2) The Department shall include in its report measurable long–term
[goals] TARGETS, and intermediate benchmarks of progress toward the attainment of the
long–term goals, for the following measurable transportation indicators:
(i) An increase in the share of total person trips for each of transit,
high occupancy auto, pedestrian, and bicycle modes of travel;
(ii) A decrease in indicators of traffic congestion as determined by
the Department; and
(iii) Any other performance goals established by the Department for
reducing automobile traffic and increasing the use of nonautomobile traffic.

SENATE BILL 198
(3) (i) Beginning with the 2024 attainment report on transportation
system performance, the advisory committee advising the Department on State
transportation goals, benchmarks, and indicators shall recommend measurable
transportation indicators that can be evaluated for racial, disability, ethnic, and
low–income disparities based on available sources or information.
(ii) The Department shall evaluate the indicators recommended
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph to identify any racial, disability, ethnic, or
low–income disparities.
(4) The performance indicators [or], benchmarks, OR TARGETS described
in this subsection shall acknowledge the difference between urban and rural transportation
needs.
(i) The [Smart] SUSTAINABLE Growth Subcabinet, established under Title 9,
Subtitle 14 of the State Government Article, shall conduct an annual review of the State
transportation goals, benchmarks, and indicators.
(j) (1) An advisory committee shall be assembled to advise the Department on
the MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION PLAN AND THE State transportation goals,
INDICATORS, benchmarks, [and indicators] AND TARGETS under subsection (h) of this
section.
(2) Membership of the advisory committee shall include but is not limited
to the following members appointed by the Governor:
(i) A representative of the Maryland business community;
(ii) A representative of the disabled citizens community;
(iii) A representative of rural interests;
(iv) A representative of an auto users group;
(v) A representative of a transit users group;
(vi) A representative of the goods movement industry;
(vii) A nationally recognized expert on transportation demand
management;
(viii) A nationally recognized expert on pedestrian and bicycle
transportation;
(ix) A nationally recognized expert on transportation performance
measurement;

SENATE BILL 198 13
(x) A representative of an environmental advocacy organization;
(xi) A representative from the Maryland Department of Planning;
(xii) A representative of the Maryland Association of Counties;
(xiii) A representative of the Maryland Municipal League;
(xiv) A representative of the Maryland State Conference of the
National Association for the Advancement of Colored People;
(xv) A representative of a transportation labor organization,
designated by the Maryland State and District of Columbia AFL–CIO; and
(xvi) A representative of the transportation construction industry.
(3) The Governor shall appoint the chairman of the advisory committee.
(4) The advisory committee shall meet at least four times during the
process of developing the Maryland Transportation Plan to provide advice to the
Department on meeting the requirements of this subsection.
(5) The Department and the advisory committee shall consider the
following:
(i) Transportation and population trends and their impact on the
State’s transportation system and priority funding areas;
(ii) Past and present State funding devoted to the various
transportation modes and demand management;
(iii) The full range of unmet transportation needs in priority funding
areas;
(iv) The full range of transportation measures and facilities
available, and their role, effectiveness, and cost effectiveness in providing travel choices
and reducing congestion;
(v) A review of transportation performance indicators and their use
in other states;
(vi) A review of the coordination of State transportation investments
with local growth plans for priority funding areas;
(vii) The types of investments needed and their levels of funding for
supporting the [State] STATE’S transportation goals [and measures established under §
2–103.7 of this subtitle];

SENATE BILL 198
(viii) The impact of transportation investment on:
1. The environment;
2. Environmental justice as defined in § 1–701 of the
Environment Article;
3. Communities;
4. Economic development;
5. Racial equity; and
6. Persons with disabilities, including service accessibility;
and
(ix) The Climate Action Plan goals required by [the Greenhouse Gas
Emissions Reduction Act of 2009 under] § 2–1205(b) of the Environment Article.
(k) [The Department may:
(1) Conduct its analysis of planned transportation investments in priority
funding areas on a statewide basis or in groupings of priority funding areas centered on
regions, metropolitan areas, cities, or other groupings suitable for transportation modeling;
and
(2) Choose to exclude from its analysis priority funding areas which have
an insignificant role in transportation trends because of small size, population, or physical
isolation.
(l)] In the report required under subsection (g) of this section, the Department
shall:
(1) Use narrative, graphs, charts, tables, and maps as appropriate to make
the results easily understood by the public;
(2) Include projected long–term trends for each of the indicators and the
effect of planned transportation investments on the trends;
(3) To the extent practicable, account for the effect of planned
transportation investments on inducing automobile travel;
(4) To the extent practicable, account for automobile trips not taken due to
demand management measures, including teleworking, teleshopping, and land use
patterns supporting alternatives to driving; and

SENATE BILL 198 15
(5) Indicate the cost effectiveness of investments for achieving relevant
performance goals and benchmarks, including a specific analysis of planned transportation
investments detailing:
(i) Any projected decreases or increases in indicators of traffic
congestion and accessibility as defined by the Department; and
(ii) The cost per passenger mile and other indicators of cost
effectiveness as defined by the Department, including the estimated annual cost of
maintenance and operations.
[(m)] (L) (1) (i) Subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article:
1. On or before September 1 of each year, the Department
shall submit copies of the proposed Consolidated Transportation Program and the
supporting financial forecast to the General Assembly; and
2. On submission of the budget bill to the presiding officers
of the General Assembly, the Department shall submit copies of the approved Consolidated
Transportation Program, including the manner in which each major transportation project
was evaluated and ranked under § 2–103.7 of this subtitle, and the supporting financial
forecast to the General Assembly.
(ii) Notwithstanding § 2–1257(b)(2) of the State Government Article,
the Department shall provide to each member of the General Assembly a copy of the
proposed Consolidated Transportation Program and the approved Consolidated
Transportation Program.
(2) (i) The financial forecast supporting the Consolidated
Transportation Program to be submitted to the General Assembly under paragraph (1) of
this subsection shall include the following components:
1. A schedule of operating expenses for each specific modal
administration;
2. A schedule of revenues, including tax and fee revenues,
deductions from revenues for other agencies, Department program and fees, Motor Vehicle
Administration cost recovery, deductions for highway user revenues, operating revenues
by modal administration, and miscellaneous revenues; and
3. A summary schedule for the Transportation Trust Fund
that includes the opening and closing Fund balance, revenues, transfers, bond sales, bond
premiums, any other revenues, expenditures for debt service, operating expenses, amounts
available for capital expenses, bond interest rates, bond coverage ratios, total bonds
outstanding, federal capital aid, and the total amount for the Transportation Capital
Program.

SENATE BILL 198
(ii) The financial forecast shall include, for each of the components
specified in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph:
1. Actual information for the last full fiscal year; and
2. Forecasts of the information for each of the six subsequent
fiscal years, including the current fiscal year, the fiscal year for the proposed budget, and
the next four subsequent fiscal years.
(iii) 1. For the period beyond the budget request year, the
financial forecast:
A. Shall maximize the use of funds for the capital program;
B. Except as authorized by law, may not withhold or reserve
funds for capital transportation grants to counties or municipal corporations; and
C. Except as provided in subsubparagraph 2 of this
subparagraph, shall increase the operating expenses, net of availability payments paid to
public–private partnership concessionaires, each year by at least the 5–year average
annual rate of change in the operating expenses of the Department, ending with the most
recently completed fiscal year.
2. The assumed rate of future operating budget growth
under subsubparagraph 1C of this subparagraph may not increase or decrease by more
than 0.5 percentage points from the growth rate assumed in the previous forecast.
(iv) The Department shall incorporate in the financial forecast the
most recent estimates by the Board of Revenue Estimates of the revenues from:
1. The corporate income tax and the sales and use tax for
each of the six subsequent years, including the current fiscal year and the fiscal year for
the proposed budget; and
2. Motor fuel taxes and motor vehicle titling taxes for the
current fiscal year and the fiscal year for the proposed budget.
2–103.7.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “LOCALLY MANAGED CAPITAL PROJECT” MEANS A CAPITAL
PROJECT PERFORMED BY A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION IN A RIGHT–OF–WAY
CONTROLLED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR THE MARYLAND
TRANSIT ADMINISTRATION.
(3) “Major capital project” has the meaning stated in § 2–103.1 of this

SENATE BILL 198 17
subtitle.
[(3)] (4) (i) “Major SURFACE transportation project” means a major
capital project in the State Highway Administration or the Maryland Transit
Administration [whose] OR THAT IS A LOCALLY MANAGED CAPITAL PROJECT:
1. WHOSE total cost for all phases exceeds $5,000,000; and
[that:
1. Increases highway or transit capacity;
2. Reduces areas of heavy traffic congestion;
3. Improves commute times in areas of heavy traffic
congestion;
4. Improves transit stations or station areas; or
5. Improves highway capacity through the use of intelligent
transportation systems or congestion management systems]
2. THAT INCREASES THE CAPACITY OR ABILITY OF THE
HIGHWAY, TRANSIT, OR RAIL SYSTEM TO MOVE PEOPLE AND GOODS.
(ii) “Major SURFACE transportation project” does not include:
1. Projects in the Maryland Aviation Administration, the
Maryland Port Administration, THE MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION, THE OFFICE
OF THE SECRETARY, or the Maryland Transportation Authority;
2. Maintenance and storage facilities projects;
3. Water quality improvement projects;
4. Projects related to Maryland’s priorities for total
maximum daily load development;
5. Safety–related projects [that do not increase highway or
transit capacity] THAT RECEIVE FUNDING UNDER 23 U.S.C. § 148 OR THAT DO NOT
SIGNIFICANTLY INCREASE TRANSIT CAPACITY;
6. [Roads within the Appalachian Development Highway
System; or
7.] Projects that are solely for system preservation OR STATE
OF GOOD REPAIR PURPOSES; OR

SENATE BILL 198
7. PROJECTS FUNDED WITH FEDERAL SOURCES EXEMPT
FROM THE PROJECT–BASED SCORING PROCESS DUE TO EXISTING EVALUATION
PROCESSES, INCLUDING:
A. CONGESTION MITIGATION AIR QUALITY FUNDS;
B. TRANSPORTATION ALTERNATIVES FUNDS;
C. PROTECT PROGRAM FUNDS;
D. CARBON REDUCTION PROGRAM FUNDS; AND
E. FUNDS FROM A FEDERAL PROGRAM ESTABLISHED BY
THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT AFTER JANUARY 1, 2024, WITH SPECIFIC RULES THAT
SIGNIFICANTLY RESTRICT THE TYPES OR LOCATIONS OF PROJECTS THAT MAY BE
FUNDED.
(5) (I) “SMALL SURFACE TRANSPORTATION PROJECT” MEANS A
MAJOR CAPITAL PROJECT IN THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR THE
MARYLAND TRANSIT ADMINISTRATION OR THAT IS A LOCALLY MANAGED CAPITAL
PROJECT:
1. WHOSE TOTAL COST FOR ALL PHASES IS LESS THAN
OR EQUAL TO $5,000,000; AND
2. THAT INCREASES THE CAPACITY OR ABILITY OF THE
HIGHWAY, TRANSIT, OR RAIL SYSTEM TO MOVE PEOPLE AND GOODS.
(II) “SMALL SURFACE TRANSPORTATION PROJECT” DOES NOT
INCLUDE:
1. PROJECTS IN THE MARYLAND AVIATION
ADMINISTRATION, THE MARYLAND PORT ADMINISTRATION, THE MOTOR VEHICLE
ADMINISTRATION, THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY, OR THE MARYLAND
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY;
2. MAINTENANCE AND STORAGE FACILITIES PROJECTS;
3. WATER QUALITY IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS;
4. PROJECTS RELATED TO MARYLAND’S PRIORITIES
FOR TOTAL MAXIMUM DAILY LOAD DEVELOPMENT;

SENATE BILL 198 19
5. SAFETY–RELATED PROJECTS THAT RECEIVE
FUNDING UNDER 23 U.S.C. § 148 OR THAT DO NOT SIGNIFICANTLY INCREASE
TRANSIT CAPACITY;
6. PROJECTS THAT ARE SOLELY FOR SYSTEM
PRESERVATION OR STATE OF GOOD REPAIR PURPOSES; OR
7. PROJECTS FUNDED WITH FEDERAL SOURCES EXEMPT
FROM THE PROJECT–BASED SCORING PROCESS DUE TO EXISTING EVALUATION
PROCESSES, INCLUDING:
A. CONGESTION MITIGATION AIR QUALITY FUNDS;
B. TRANSPORTATION ALTERNATIVES FUNDS;
C. PROTECT PROGRAM FUNDS;
D. CARBON REDUCTION PROGRAM FUNDS; AND
E. FUNDS FROM A FEDERAL PROGRAM ESTABLISHED BY
THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT AFTER JANUARY 1, 2024, WITH SPECIFIC RULES THAT
SIGNIFICANTLY RESTRICT THE TYPES OR LOCATIONS OF PROJECTS THAT MAY BE
FUNDED.
(b) The Department shall:
(1) [In accordance with federal transportation requirements, develop a
project–based scoring system for major transportation projects using the goals and
measures established under subsection (c) of this section;] DEVELOP, IN CONSULTATION
WITH THE APPLICABLE METROPOLITAN PLANNING ORGANIZATIONS, FOR THE
MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION’S REVIEW A PROJECT–BASED SCORING
SYSTEM THAT:
(I) IS CONSISTENT WITH THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) IS DEVELOPED IN ACCORDANCE WITH FEDERAL
TRANSPORTATION REQUIREMENTS; AND
(III) EVALUATES MAJOR SURFACE TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS
USING OBJECTIVE AND QUANTIFIABLE MEASURES FOR THE GOALS ESTABLISHED
UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION THAT CONSIDER THE BENEFITS OF A
PROJECT RELATIVE TO ITS COST TO THE STATE.
(2) Develop the weighting metrics for each goal and measure established

SENATE BILL 198
under [subsection (c)] PARAGRAPH (1) of this [section] SUBSECTION;
(3) [On or before January 1, 2018, develop a model consistent with this
section that uses the project–based scoring system developed under this subsection to rank
major transportation projects being considered for inclusion in the draft and final
Consolidated Transportation Program;] PUBLISH THE GUIDELINES DEVELOPED TO
IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION, AS REVIEWED BY THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION;
(4) [Use the model developed under this subsection to rank major
transportation projects being considered for inclusion in the draft and final Consolidated
Transportation Program; and] AT LEAST EVERY 2 YEARS, IN COORDINATION WITH THE
MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION, REVIEW AND UPDATE THE
GUIDELINES, AS NECESSARY;
(5) [Make the model developed under item (3) of this subsection and any
ranking under item (4) of this subsection available to the public:
(i) As an appendix to the Consolidated Transportation Program;
and
(ii) On the Department’s website] IDENTIFY THE AMOUNT OF
FUNDS AVAILABLE FOR EACH 2–YEAR FUNDING CYCLE AFTER NEEDS ASSOCIATED
WITH THE FOLLOWING HAVE BEEN CONSIDERED:
(I) OPERATING, ADMINISTRATION, AND MAINTENANCE COSTS
OF THE DEPARTMENT;
(II) GRANTS TO OTHER ENTITIES, INCLUDING:
1. DISTRIBUTION OF HIGHWAY USER REVENUES TO
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS CONSISTENT WITH TITLE 8, SUBTITLE 4 OF THIS ARTICLE;
2. DISTRIBUTION OF LOCALLY OPERATED TRANSIT
SYSTEM GRANTS; AND
3. DISTRIBUTION OF FUNDS TO THE WASHINGTON
METROPOLITAN AREA TRANSIT AUTHORITY;
(III) ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS, INCLUDING SALARIES, WAGES,
AND FRINGE BENEFITS, RELATED TO OVERSIGHT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
DEPARTMENT’S CAPITAL PROGRAM;
(IV) CAPITAL FUNDING THAT INCLUDES:

SENATE BILL 198 21
1. FUNDS FOR CAPITAL PROJECTS OF THE MARYLAND
AVIATION ADMINISTRATION, THE MARYLAND PORT ADMINISTRATION, THE MOTOR
VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION, AND THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY;
2. FUNDS FOR THE HIGHWAY SYSTEM PRESERVATION
PURPOSES AND STATE OF GOOD REPAIR; AND
3. FUNDS FOR THE TRANSIT PROJECTS WHERE THE
PRIMARY PURPOSE IS STATE OF GOOD REPAIR; AND
(V) ALL OTHER CAPITAL NEEDS FOR PROJECTS NOT SUBJECT
TO THE PROJECT–BASED SCORING SYSTEM FOR MAJOR SURFACE TRANSPORTATION
CAPITAL PROJECTS; AND
(6) (I) AT LEAST EVERY 2 YEARS, SOLICIT REQUESTS FROM THE
DEPARTMENT, LOCAL JURISDICTIONS, AND APPROPRIATE METROPOLITAN
PLANNING ORGANIZATIONS, FOR MAJOR SURFACE TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS TO
BE EVALUATED; AND
(II) REQUIRE EACH REQUESTER TO CERTIFY THAT ALL
MEMBERS OF THE LEGISLATIVE DELEGATION OF THE MARYLAND GENERAL
ASSEMBLY THAT REPRESENTS THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE PROJECT IS LOCATED
HAVE BEEN NOTIFIED OF THE REQUEST.
(c) (1) The [State transportation goals are] DEPARTMENT SHALL
EVALUATE MAJOR SURFACE TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS BASED ON POLICY GOALS.
(2) PROJECTS SHALL BE EVALUATED ON HOW EACH PROJECT
ADDRESSES:
(i) Safety [and security];
(ii) [System preservation] ACCESSIBILITY AND MOBILITY;
(iii) [Reducing congestion and improving commute times] CLIMATE
CHANGE AND THE ENVIRONMENT;
(iv) [Environmental stewardship] SOCIAL EQUITY;
(v) [Community vitality;] ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT; AND
(vi) [Economic prosperity;

SENATE BILL 198
(vii) Equitable access to transportation;
(viii) Cost effectiveness and return on investment; and
(ix) Local priorities] LAND USE AND TRANSPORTATION DEMAND
MANAGEMENT.
[(2) In evaluating whether and to what extent a major transportation
project satisfies the goals established under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
Department shall assign a score for each goal using the weighting metrics developed by the
Department under subsection (b)(2) of this section and the following measures:
(i) For safety and security:
1. The expected reduction in total fatalities and severe
injuries in all modes affected by the project; and
2. The extent to which the project implements the Maryland
State Highway Administration’s Complete Streets policies.
(ii) For system preservation:
1. The degree to which the project increases the lifespan of
the affected facility;
2. The degree to which the project increases the functionality
of the facility; and
3. The degree to which the project renders the facility more
resilient.
(iii) For reducing congestion and improving commute times:
1. The expected change in cumulative job accessibility within
an approximately 60–minute commute for highway projects or transit projects;
2. The degree to which the project has a positive impact on
travel time reliability and congestion; and
3. The degree to which the project supports connections
between different modes of transportation and promotes multiple transportation choices.
(iv) For environmental stewardship:
1. The potential of the project to limit or reduce harmful
emissions;

SENATE BILL 198 23
2. The degree to which the project avoids impacts on State
resources in the project area and adjacent areas; and
3. The degree to which the project advances the State
environmental goals.
(v) For community vitality:
1. The degree to which the project is projected to increase the
use of walking, biking, and transit;
2. The degree to which the project enhances existing
community assets; and
3. The degree to which the project furthers the affected
community’s and State’s plans for revitalization.
(vi) For economic prosperity:
1. The projected increase in the cumulative job accessibility
within an approximately 60–minute commute for projects;
2. The extent to which the project is projected to enhance
access to critical intermodal locations for the movement of goods and services; and
3. The projected increase in furthering nonspeculative local
and State economic development strategies in existing communities.
(vii) For equitable access to transportation:
1. The expected increase in job accessibility for
disadvantaged populations within an approximately 60–minute commute for projects; and
2. The projected economic development impact on
low–income communities.
(viii) For cost effectiveness and return on investment:
1. The estimated travel time savings divided by the project
cost;
2. The degree to which the project leverages additional
federal, State, local, and private sector transportation investment; and
3. The degree to which the project will increase
transportation alternatives and redundancy.

SENATE BILL 198
(ix) For local priorities, the degree to which the project supports local
government transportation priorities, as specified in local government priority letters.]
(d) (1) The score of a major SURFACE transportation project shall be based
solely on the BENEFITS OF A PROJECT TOWARD THE goals and measures established
under subsection (c) of this section RELATIVE TO A PROJECT’S COST TO THE STATE.
(2) [The] BY AUGUST 15 EACH EVEN–NUMBERED FISCAL YEAR, THE
Department shall make the scores of all projects evaluated AND THE LIST OF ALL
PROJECTS RECOMMENDED for inclusion in the Consolidated Transportation Program
[and assigned a score under the model] available to the public[:
(i) As an appendix to the Consolidated Transportation Program;
and
(ii) On] ON the Department’s Web site.
(3) THE RECOMMENDATIONS MADE BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY ONLY BE MODIFIED IF THE
MODIFICATION IS REVIEWED BY THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
AFTER THE DEPARTMENT HAS COMPLETED ITS EVALUATION UNDER SUBSECTION
(C) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) (1) ON THE COMPLETION OF A ROUND OF PROJECT EVALUATIONS,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL UNDERTAKE A REVIEW OF THE PROJECT–BASED SCORING
SYSTEM AND RELATED GUIDELINES TO DETERMINE WHETHER MODIFICATIONS TO
THE GUIDELINES ARE NECESSARY.
(2) IN THE EVENT THAT THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT
MODIFICATIONS ARE NECESSARY, THE RECOMMENDED MODIFICATIONS SHALL BE
PRESENTED TO THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION FOR REVIEW.
(F) EACH YEAR, THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION AND MARYLAND
TRANSIT ADMINISTRATION SHALL EVALUATE SMALL SURFACE TRANSPORTATION
PROJECTS USING A METHODOLOGY CONSISTENT WITH THE SYSTEM DEVELOPED
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, PUBLISH THE RESULTS OF THE
EVALUATION, AND SELECT PROJECTS BASED ON THE RESULTS OF THE EVALUATION.
(G) A MAJOR SURFACE TRANSPORTATION PROJECT MAY BE INCLUDED IN
THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM FOR CONSTRUCTION ONLY IF IT
HAS BEEN EVALUATED BY THE PROJECT–BASED SCORING PROGRAM IN THIS
SUBTITLE.
[(e)] (H) Nothing in this section may be construed to impede or alter:

SENATE BILL 198 25
(1) The priority letter process that outlines local transportation priorities
for the Department’s consideration for inclusion in the Consolidated Transportation
Program under § 2–103.1 of this subtitle;
(2) The Department’s visit to each county under § 2–103.1(e) of this
subtitle; or
(3) The inclusion of local transportation priorities in the Consolidated
Transportation Program.
2–202.
There is a Maryland Transportation Commission in the Department.
2–203.
(a) The Commission consists of the following [17] members:
(1) [As ex officio members, the seven regional members of the State Roads
Commission; and
(2) Ten members appointed by the Governor with the advice of the
Secretary] THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(2) EIGHT MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR, WITH AT LEAST
FOUR MEMBERS REPRESENTING URBANIZED AREAS AND AT LEAST TWO MEMBERS
REPRESENTING RURAL AREAS;
(3) TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE; AND
(4) TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE.
(b) An appointed member may not be [an]:
(1) AN officer or employee of the Department;
(2) A STATE OR LOCAL ELECTED OFFICIAL; OR
(3) AN APPOINTED OFFICIAL OF THE STATE OR A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT.
(C) Each appointed member shall be a resident of this State and have interest
and, preferably, experience in at least one of the fields under the jurisdiction of the
Department.

SENATE BILL 198
[(c)] (D) (1) Each appointed member serves for a term of [3] 4 years and until
his successor is appointed and qualifies. [The terms of appointed members shall be
staggered as required by the original appointments to the Commission, three of which were
made for a 3–year term, four of which were made for a 2–year term, and three of which
were made for a 1–year term.]
(2) THE TERMS OF MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS REQUIRED BY
THE TERMS PROVIDED FOR MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION ON JULY 1, 2025.
(3) EACH APPOINTED MEMBER MAY BE REAPPOINTED AT THE
DISCRETION OF THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY.
[(2)] (4) A member appointed to fill a vacancy in an unexpired term serves
only for the remainder of that term.
2–204.
(a) The [Governor shall designate one of the appointed members of the
Commission as its Chairman] SECRETARY IS THE CHAIR OF THE COMMISSION.
(b) The Commission shall meet, at a time and place designated by the
Commission or its [Chairman] CHAIR:
(1) At least once each [month] QUARTER; and
(2) At any other time that the Secretary requests.
2–205.
(a) (1) The [Maryland Transportation] Commission shall study the entire
transportation system of this State and regularly discuss with the Secretary any matter
relating to this State’s transportation system.
(2) [Each of the seven regional members of the State Roads Commission,
who serve as ex officio members of the Maryland Transportation Commission, shall:
(i) Conduct a continuing survey of the secondary highways, as
defined in § 8–101 of this article, in that member’s region; and
(ii) Report on the highway needs and problems of that region to the
Maryland Transportation Commission.
(3)] The [Maryland Transportation] Commission may request of the
Secretary any information relating to the Department that is needed for the Commission’s
studies, surveys, and deliberations.

SENATE BILL 198 27
(b) The Commission shall [advise] HAVE THE FOLLOWING POWERS AND
DUTIES:
(1) ADVISE and make recommendations to the Secretary and the heads of
the units in the Department on all matters that concern transportation policy formation
and program execution;
(2) REVIEW, ADVISE, AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE
SECRETARY ON THE DEPARTMENT’S QUARTERLY OPERATING AND CAPITAL
BUDGET UPDATES;
(3) REVIEW AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS ON A POLICY TO
IMPLEMENT THE PROJECT–BASED SCORING SYSTEM UNDER § 2–103.7 OF THIS
TITLE; AND
(4) REVIEW AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS CONCERNING THE
MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION PLAN.
7–309.
(b) In undertaking the assessment required under subsection (a) of this section,
the Administration shall:
(1) Compile and prioritize capital needs without regard to cost;
(2) Identify the backlog of repairs and replacements needed to achieve a
state of good repair for all Administration assets, including a separate analysis of these
needs over the following 10 years; [and]
(3) Identify the needs to be met in order to enhance service and achieve
system performance goals; AND
(4) DEVELOP ASSET MANAGEMENT PRACTICES IN THE OPERATION
AND MAINTENANCE OF STATE TRANSIT ASSETS CONSISTENT WITH REQUIREMENTS
UNDER 49 U.S.C. § 5326.
(E) ON AN ANNUAL BASIS, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL PRIORITIZE
CAPITAL NEEDS BASED ON THE ALLOCATION AVAILABLE FOR TRANSIT STATE OF
GOOD REPAIR.
8–502.
The purpose of this subtitle is to assist the national recovery and promote the general
welfare by enabling this State and its political subdivisions to provide matching funds for

SENATE BILL 198
and secure the benefits of any federal funds available under the federal acts for the
[construction and reconstruction of State highways and county roads and for related State
or local projects] DEVELOPMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF A MULTIMODAL SURFACE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK.
SUBTITLE 11. ASSET MANAGEMENT PRACTICES.
8–1101.
(A) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL DEVELOP ASSET MANAGEMENT
PRACTICES IN THE OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE OF THE SYSTEMS OF STATE
HIGHWAYS.
(2) THE PRACTICES SHALL INCLUDE A TRANSPARENT
METHODOLOGY FOR PRIORITIZING THE ALLOCATION OF FUNDS AVAILABLE FOR
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS, INCLUDING THE ALLOCATION AMONG
THE ADMINISTRATION’S DISTRICTS.
(B) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ENSURE THE WORK COMPLIES WITH ANY
APPLICABLE FEDERAL REQUIREMENTS FOR THE CONDITION OF THE NATIONAL
HIGHWAY SYSTEM UNDER 23 U.S.C. § 119.
8–1102.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL
ESTABLISH PERFORMANCE TARGETS FOR THE CONDITION OF PAVEMENTS AND
BRIDGES ON STATE HIGHWAYS COVERING A PERIOD OF AT LEAST 20 YEARS.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2030, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL
ESTABLISH PERFORMANCE TARGETS FOR THE CONDITION OF OTHER KEY ASSETS
COVERING AN APPROPRIATE TIME FRAME FOR THE ASSETS.
(C) (1) EVERY 4 YEARS THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL UNDERTAKE A
COMPREHENSIVE REVIEW OF THE CURRENT AND FUTURE CONDITIONS OF
PAVEMENTS, BRIDGES, AND OTHER KEY ASSETS ON STATE HIGHWAYS.
(2) THE REVIEW SHALL:
(I) CONSIDER CURRENT CONDITIONS AND PERFORMANCE
TARGETS;
(II) CONSIDER CURRENT INVESTMENT STRATEGIES FOR FUNDS
ALLOCATED TO THE ADMINISTRATION FOR THE HIGHWAY STATE OF GOOD REPAIR
PROGRAM UNDER § 8–1103 OF THIS SUBTITLE;

SENATE BILL 198 29
(III) RECOMMEND, IF APPROPRIATE, NEW PERFORMANCE
TARGETS FOR ASSETS WITH ESTABLISHED TARGETS WITH SUSTAINABLE
PERFORMANCE OVER A 20–YEAR PERIOD; AND
(IV) DEVELOP OR UPDATE, AS APPROPRIATE, AN INVESTMENT
STRATEGY FOR FUNDS ALLOCATED TO THE ADMINISTRATION FOR THE HIGHWAY
STATE OF GOOD REPAIR PROGRAM UNDER § 8–1103 OF THIS SUBTITLE TO ACHIEVE
THE SUSTAINABLE PERFORMANCE TARGETS.
8–1103.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE HIGHWAY STATE OF GOOD
REPAIR PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THERE IS A HIGHWAY STATE OF GOOD REPAIR PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO IMPROVE THE CONDITION OF
PAVEMENTS, BRIDGES, AND OTHER KEY ASSETS ON STATE HIGHWAYS TO ACHIEVE
AND, AS APPROPRIATE, MAINTAIN THE SUSTAINABLE CONDITION TARGETS
ESTABLISHED BY THE ADMINISTRATION UNDER § 8–1102 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) AN ELIGIBLE PROJECT UNDER THE PROGRAM IS A CAPITAL PROJECT
TO REPAIR, REHABILITATE, RECONSTRUCT, OR REPLACE AN ASSET WITH THE
INTENT TO IMPROVE THE LONG–TERM CONDITION OF THE ASSET, INCLUDING
MINOR UPGRADES AND MODIFICATIONS ANCILLARY AND RELATED TO THE ASSET
NECESSARY TO MEET APPLICABLE DESIGN STANDARDS.
(E) SUBJECT TO APPROPRIATION AND AVAILABILITY, FUNDS FOR THE
PROGRAM SHALL BE PROVIDED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(F) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL DEVELOP A PRIORITY RANKING SYSTEM
FOR PAVEMENTS, BRIDGES, AND OTHER KEY ASSETS THAT TAKES INTO
CONSIDERATION USEFUL LIFE, AGE, CONDITION, AND OTHER FACTORS
DETERMINED TO BE APPROPRIATE BY THE ADMINISTRATION.
(G) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ALLOCATE FUNDS IN THE PROGRAM
BASED ON A PRIORITY RANKING SYSTEM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the members of
the Maryland Transportation Commission appointed in accordance with this Act shall
expire as follows:

SENATE BILL 198
(1) of the members appointed by the Governor:
(i) two members in 2026;
(ii) two members in 2027;
(iii) two members in 2028; and
(iv) two members in 2029;
(2) of the members appointed by the Speaker of the House:
(i) one member in 2027; and
(ii) one member in 2028; and
(3) of the members appointed by the President of the Senate:
(i) one member in 2026; and
(ii) one member in 2029.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.